Illinois, session 104th, HB5148.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 314.5 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/314.5)7    Sec. 314.5. Medication shopping; pharmacy shopping.8    (a) It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or 9intentionally to fraudulently obtain or fraudulently seek to 10obtain any controlled substance or prescription for a 11controlled substance from a prescriber or dispenser while 12being supplied with any controlled substance or prescription 13for a controlled substance by another prescriber or dispenser, 14without disclosing the fact of the existing controlled 15substance or prescription for a controlled substance to the 16prescriber or dispenser from whom the subsequent controlled 17substance or prescription for a controlled substance is 18sought.19    (b) It shall be unlawful for a person knowingly or 20intentionally to fraudulently obtain or fraudulently seek to 21obtain any controlled substance from a pharmacy while being 22supplied with any controlled substance by another pharmacy, 23without disclosing the fact of the existing controlled   HB5148 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17903 RLC 31339 b1substance to the pharmacy from which the subsequent controlled 2substance is sought.3    (c) A person may be in violation of Section 3.23 of the 4Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act or Section 406 of this Act 5when medication shopping or pharmacy shopping, or both.6    (c-5) Each Effective January 1, 2018, each prescriber 7possessing an Illinois controlled substances license shall 8register with the Prescription Monitoring Program. A 9prescriber is not subject to criminal liability or 10professional discipline for failure to register with the 11Prescription Monitoring Program due to technological or 12electrical failures or operational issues that prevent 13registration. Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 14contrary, beginning on and after the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, a licensed 16veterinarian shall be exempt from registration and prohibited 17from accessing patient information in the Prescription 18Monitoring Program. Licensed veterinarians that are existing 19registrants shall be removed from the Prescription Monitoring 20Program. Each prescriber or the prescriber's his or her 21designee shall also document an attempt to access patient 22information in the Prescription Monitoring Program to assess 23patient access to controlled substances when providing an 24initial prescription for any stimulant substances listed in 25Schedule II and all prescriptions an initial prescription for 26Schedule II opioids and Schedule IV benzodiazepine, narcotics   HB5148 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17903 RLC 31339 b1such as opioids, except for prescriptions for oncology 2treatment or palliative care, or a 7-day or less supply 3provided by a hospital emergency department when treating a an 4acute, traumatic medical condition. This attempt to access 5shall be documented in the patient's medical record. The 6hospital shall facilitate the designation of a prescriber's 7designee for the purpose of accessing the Prescription 8Monitoring Program for services provided at the hospital. 9    (d) When a person has been identified as having 5 or more 10prescribers or 5 or more pharmacies, or both, that do not 11utilize a common electronic file as specified in Section 20 of 12the Pharmacy Practice Act for controlled substances within the 13course of a 6-month period, the Prescription Monitoring 14Program may issue an unsolicited report to the prescribers, 15dispensers, and their designees informing them of the 16potential medication shopping. If an unsolicited report is 17issued to a prescriber or prescribers, then the report must 18also be sent to the applicable dispensing pharmacy. 19    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create a 20requirement that any prescriber, dispenser, or pharmacist 21request any patient medication disclosure, report any patient 22activity, or prescribe or refuse to prescribe or dispense any 23medications.24    (f) This Section shall not be construed to apply to 25inpatients or residents at hospitals or other institutions or 26to institutional pharmacies.  HB5148 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17903 RLC 31339 b1    (g) Any patient feedback, including grades, ratings, or 2written or verbal statements, in opposition to a clinical 3decision that the prescription of a controlled substance is 4not medically necessary shall not be the basis of any adverse 5action, evaluation, or any other type of negative 6credentialing, contracting, licensure, or employment action 7taken against a prescriber or dispenser. 8(Source: P.A. 101-414, eff. 8-16-19; 102-527, eff. 8-20-21.)